Washington statutes.
RCW 39.110.100

Financing documents with borrowers—Trust—Trust agreement.

(1)(a) An authority may enter into financing documents with borrowers regarding bonds issued by the authority that may provide for the payment by each borrower of amounts sufficient, together with other revenues available to the authority, if any, to:

(i) Pay the borrower's share of the fees established by the authority;

(ii) Pay the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on outstanding bonds of the authority issued in respect of such borrower as the same become due and payable; and

(iii) Create and maintain reserves required or provided for by the authority in connection with the issuance of such bonds.

(b) The payments are not subject to supervision or regulation by any department, committee, board, body, bureau, or agency of the state.

(2) All money received by or on behalf of the authority with respect to this issuance of its bonds must be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this chapter. The authority, in lieu of receiving and applying the moneys itself, may enter into trust agreement or indenture with one or more banks or trust companies having the power and authority to conduct trust business in the state to:

(a) Perform all or any part of the obligations of the authority with respect to:

(i) Bonds issued by it;

(ii) The receipt, investment, and application of the proceeds of the bonds and money paid by a participant or available from other sources for the payment of the bonds;

(iii) The enforcement of the obligations of a borrower in connection with the financing or refinancing of any project; and

(iv) Other matters relating to the exercise of the authority's powers under this chapter;

(b) Receive, hold, preserve, and enforce any security interest or evidence of security interest granted by a participant for purposes of securing the payment of the bonds; and

(c) Act on behalf of the authority or the owners of bonds of the authority for purposes of assuring or enforcing the payment of the bonds, when due.

[ 2012 c 193 s 12.]